Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.240

Nonliability of state, members, employees.

Obligations incurred by the commission shall be enforced only against the assets of the commission in the same manner as if it were a corporation and no liability for the debts or acts of the commission shall exist against either the state of Washington, or against any member, officer, employee, or agent of the commission in his or her individual capacity. The members of the commission including employees of the commission, shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes or other acts, either of commission or omission as principal, agent, person or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. The liability of the members of the commission shall not be several and joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6036; 1969 c 129 s 24.]